Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.340

Primary grade reading grant program—Timelines—Rules.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction may use up to one percent of the appropriated funds for administration of the primary grade reading grant program established in chapter 262, Laws of 1997.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt timelines and rules as necessary under chapter 34.05 RCW to administer the primary reading grant program in RCW 28A.300.310.

(3) Funding under this section shall not become a part of the state's basic program of education obligation as set forth under Article IX of the state Constitution.

[ 1997 c 262 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—1997 c 262: See note following RCW 28A.300.310.